Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 184.492 is amended to read:
184.492. (1) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall:
(a) Contract with a nongovernmental entity to serve as  the statewide coordinating entity for the
provision  of  court appointed special advocate services throughout this state. The nongovernmental
entity must [ be a member of the National CASA Association ] follow nationally recognized CASA
standards and have a  board or other membership structure that [ contains] includes directors from
the CASA Volunteer Programs in this state. At a minimum, the contract  must include authority for
the statewide coordinating entity to:
(A) Contract with CASA Volunteer Programs; and
(B) Disburse and expend moneys in the Court Appointed Special Advocate Fund established  in
ORS 184.498 to CASA Volunteer Programs in this state.
(b) Disburse and expend  moneys in the Court Appointed Special Advocate Fund established un-
der ORS 184.498 for the purposes set forth in this section  and ORS 419B.112. The department shall
disburse and expend moneys  from the fund to the statewide coordinating entity contracted with
pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection for the purposes set forth in  this section and ORS
419B.112. No moneys may be distributed to a CASA  Volunteer Program until the program has sub-
mitted to  the statewide coordinating entity the program’s annual diversity, equity, inclusion and
accountability plan.
(c) Contract with the statewide coordinating entity contracted with pursuant to  paragraph (a)
of this  subsection for oversight of the provision of court appointed special advocate services
throughout this state in a uniform,  equitable, consistent and cost-efficient manner and to ensure that
CASA Volunteer Programs comply with the state and national standards and  practices [ and with
the National  CASA Association’s standards and practices ] and perform the duties and functions un-
der ORS 419B.112.
(d) Require the statewide coordinating entity contracted  with pursuant to paragraph (a) of this
subsection to oversee the CASA Volunteer Programs to ensure that each program:
(A) Uses metrics to track volunteer demographics and  develops a detailed diversity recruitment
plan that reflects the demographics of children in foster care in the counties  served by the program;
(B) Adopts a mission and values statement;
(C) Regularly reviews  and updates its plans and policies consistent with the [ National CASA
Association’s ] nationally recognized CASA standards, including an annual review and update of the
program’s diversity, equity, inclusion and accountability plans;
Enrolled House Bill 2582 (HB 2582-INTRO) Page 1
(D) Conducts an annual financial audit or review; and
(E) Has a sustainable growth plan, if applicable.
(e) Require the statewide coordinating entity contracted with  pursuant to paragraph (a) of this
subsection to develop and provide training and education for court  appointed special advocates and
employees and other volunteers in CASA  Volunteer Programs. The training and education must be
consistent with [ the National CASA Association’s ] nationally recognized CASA standards and in-
clude culturally specific  and community-responsive training components. The training and education
for each program must  be tailored to the program’s identified equity and outreach needs. The
statewide coordinating entity  shall make available additional training opportunities regarding cul-
tural responsiveness and skill building, as needed and as resources allow.
(f) Adopt rules for carrying out the department’s responsibilities,  duties and functions under this
section and ORS 419B.112.
(2) The department may:
(a) Consult with the statewide  coordinating entity contracted with under subsection (1)(a) of this
section for the purpose of developing:
(A) An allocation formula for the disbursement of moneys to CASA Volunteer Programs  in this
state; and
(B) Policies, procedures, standards and guidelines regarding the provision of court  appointed
special advocate services in this state taking into consideration [ the National CASA Association’s ]
nationally recognized CASA standards.
(b) Apply  for and receive funds from state, federal and private sources for CASA Volunteer
Programs and the provision of court appointed special advocate services in this state.
(3) The statewide coordinating entity with which the department has contracted  under sub-
section (1)(a) of this section shall provide biannual reports to the department regarding:
(a) The fulfillment of responsibilities that have been contracted for or delegated; and
(b) The achievement of the objectives in subsection (1)(b) and (c) of this section.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 419A.004 is amended to read:
419A.004. As used in this chapter  and ORS chapters 419B and 419C, unless the context requires
otherwise:
(1) “Adjudicated youth” means a person who  has been found to be within the jurisdiction of the
juvenile court under ORS 419C.005 for  an act committed when the person was under 18 years of age.
(2) “Age-appropriate or developmentally appropriate activities” means:
(a) Activities or items that are generally accepted as suitable for children of  the same chrono-
logical age or level of  maturity or that are determined to be developmentally appropriate for a child,
based on  the development of cognitive, emotional, physical and behavioral capacities that are typical
for an age or age group; and
(b) In the case of a specific child, activities or items that are suitable for the child based on the
developmental stages attained by  the child with respect to the cognitive, emotional, physical and
behavioral capacities of the child.
(3) “Another planned permanent living arrangement” means an out-of-home placement for a ward
16 years of age or older that  is consistent with the case plan and in the best interests of the ward
other than placement:
(a) By adoption;
(b) With a legal guardian; or
(c) With a fit and willing relative.
(4) “CASA Volunteer Program” means a program that is approved or sanctioned  by a juvenile
court[ , has received accreditation from  the National CASA Association ] and has entered into a con-
tract with the statewide coordinating entity contracted with by  the Oregon Department of Admin-
istrative Services under ORS  184.492 to recruit, train and supervise diverse and culturally
responsive volunteers to serve as court appointed special advocates.
Enrolled House Bill 2582 (HB 2582-INTRO) Page 2
(5) “Child  care center” means a residential facility for wards or adjudicated youths that is li-
censed, certified or otherwise authorized as a  child-caring agency as that term is defined in ORS
418.205.
(6) “Community service” has the meaning given that term in ORS 137.126.
(7) “Conflict of interest” means a person appointed to a local citizen review board  who has a
personal or pecuniary interest in a case being reviewed by that board.
(8) “Counselor” means a juvenile department counselor or a county juvenile probation officer.
(9) “Court” means the juvenile court.
(10) “Court appointed  special advocate” means a person in a CASA Volunteer Program who is
appointed by the court to act as a court appointed special advocate pursuant to ORS 419B.112.
(11) “Court facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 166.360.
(12) “Current caretaker” means a foster parent:
(a) Who is currently caring for a ward who  is in the legal custody of the Department of Human
Services and who has a permanency plan or concurrent permanent plan of adoption; and
(b) Who has cared for the ward, or at least one sibling of the ward, for  at least 12 cumulative
months or for one-half of the ward’s or sibling’s life where the ward or sibling is younger than  two
years of age, calculated cumulatively.
(13) “Department” means the Department of Human Services.
(14) “Detention”  or “detention facility” means a facility established under ORS 419A.010 to
419A.020 and 419A.050 to 419A.063 for the detention of youths or  adjudicated youths pursuant to a
judicial commitment or order.
(15) “Director” means the  director of a juvenile department established under ORS 419A.010 to
419A.020 and 419A.050 to 419A.063.
(16) “Guardian” means guardian of the person and not guardian of the estate.
(17) “Indian child” has the meaning given that term in ORS 419B.603.
(18) “Juvenile court” means the  court having jurisdiction of juvenile matters in the several
counties of this state.
(19) “Local citizen review board” means the board specified by ORS 419A.090 and 419A.092.
(20) “Parent”  means the biological or adoptive mother and the legal parent of the child, ward,
youth or adjudicated youth. As used in this subsection, “legal parent” means:
(a) A person who has adopted the child, ward, youth or adjudicated youth or whose parentage
has been established or declared under ORS 25.501 to 25.556 or 109.065 or by a juvenile court; and
(b) If the child is an Indian child, a man  whose parentage has been established as described in
ORS 419B.609.
(21) “Permanent foster care” means an out-of-home placement  in which there is a long-term
contractual foster care agreement between the foster parents and the department that is approved
by the juvenile court and in which the  foster parents commit to raise a ward in substitute care or
adjudicated youth until the age of majority.
(22) “Public building” has the meaning given that term in ORS 166.360.
(23) “Proctor foster home” has the meaning given that term in ORS 418.205.
(24) “Qualified residential treatment program” means a program described in ORS 418.323.
(25) “Reasonable  and prudent parent standard” means the standard, characterized by careful and
sensible parental decisions that maintain the health, safety and best interests of a child or  ward
while encouraging the emotional and developmental growth of the child or ward,  that a substitute
care provider shall use when determining whether to allow a  child or ward in substitute care to
participate in extracurricular, enrichment, cultural and social activities.
(26) “Reasonable time” means a period of time that is reasonable given a child or ward’s emo-
tional and developmental needs and ability to form and maintain lasting attachments.
(27) “Records” means any information in written form, pictures, photographs, charts,  graphs,
recordings or documents pertaining to a case.
Enrolled House Bill 2582 (HB 2582-INTRO) Page 3
(28) “Resides” or “residence,” when used in reference to the  residence of a child, ward, youth
or adjudicated youth, means  the place where the child, ward, youth or adjudicated youth is actually
living or the jurisdiction in which wardship or jurisdiction has been established.
(29) “Restitution” has the meaning given that term in ORS 137.103.
(30) “Serious physical injury” means:
(a) A serious physical injury as defined in ORS 161.015; or
(b) A physical injury that:
(A) Has a permanent or protracted significant effect on a child’s daily activities;
(B) Results in substantial and recurring pain; or
(C) In the case of a child under 10 years of age, is a broken bone.
(31) “Shelter care” means a home or other facility suitable for  the safekeeping of a child, ward,
youth or adjudicated youth who is taken into  temporary custody pending investigation and disposi-
tion.
(32) “Short-term detention facility” means a facility established  under ORS 419A.050 (3) for
holding youths and adjudicated youths pending further placement.
(33) “Sibling” means one of two or more children or wards related:
(a) By blood or adoption through a common legal parent; or
(b) Through the marriage of the children’s or wards’ legal or biological parents.
(34)(a) “Substitute care” means an out-of-home placement directly supervised by  the department
or other agency, including placement in a foster family home, group home, child-caring agency as
defined in ORS 418.205 or other child caring institution or facility.
(b) “Substitute care” does not include care in:
(A) A detention facility, forestry camp or youth correction facility;
(B) A family home  that the court has approved as a ward’s permanent placement, when a
child-caring agency as defined in ORS 418.205 has been  appointed guardian of the ward and when
the ward’s care is entirely privately financed;
(C) In-home placement subject to conditions or limitations;
(D) A facility or other entity that houses or provides services only to adjudicated youths com-
mitted to the custody of the Oregon Youth Authority by the juvenile court; or
(E) An adjudicated youth foster home as that term is defined in ORS 420.888.
(35) “Surrogate”  means a person appointed by the court to protect the right of the child, ward,
youth or adjudicated youth to receive procedural safeguards with respect to the provision  of free
appropriate public education.
(36) “Tribal court” has the meaning given that term in ORS 419B.603.
(37) “Victim” means any person determined by the district attorney, the juvenile  department or
the court to have suffered direct financial, psychological or physical  harm as a result of the act that
has brought the youth or adjudicated youth before the juvenile court. When the victim is  a minor,
“victim” includes the legal guardian of the minor. The youth or  adjudicated youth may not be con-
sidered the victim. When the victim of the crime  cannot be determined, the people of Oregon, as
represented by the district attorney, are considered the victims.
(38) “Violent felony” means any offense that, if committed  by an adult, would constitute a felony
and:
(a) Involves actual or threatened serious physical injury to a victim; or
(b) Is a sexual offense. As used in this  paragraph, “sexual offense” has the meaning given the
term “sex crime” in ORS 163A.005.
(39) “Ward” means a person within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court under ORS 419B.100.
(40) “Young person” means a person who has been  found responsible except for insanity under
ORS 419C.411 and placed under the jurisdiction of the Psychiatric Security Review Board.
(41) “Youth” means a  person under 18 years of age who is alleged to have committed an act that
is a violation, or, if done by an adult would constitute a violation, of a law or ordinance  of the
United States or a state, county or city.
(42) “Youth care center” has the meaning given that term in ORS 420.855.
Enrolled House Bill 2582 (HB 2582-INTRO) Page 4
SECTION 3.  ORS 184.489 is amended to read:
184.489. As used in ORS 184.489 to 184.498 and 419B.112:
(1) “CASA Volunteer Program”  means a program that is approved or sanctioned by a juvenile
court[ , has received accreditation from the National CASA Association ] and has  entered into a con-
tract with the statewide coordinating entity  contracted with by the Oregon Department of Admin-
istrative Services under ORS 184.492 to recruit, train and supervise  diverse and culturally
responsive volunteers to serve as court appointed special advocates.
(2) “Court appointed special advocate” means a person in a CASA Volunteer Program who is
appointed by the court to act as a court appointed special advocate pursuant to ORS 419B.112.
Passed by House February 20, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 1, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2582 (HB 2582-INTRO) Page 5